Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2704.45
Ingredient or component parts; exemption.

Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of:

(1) Property which will enter into and become an ingredient or component part of property manufactured, processed, or fabricated for ultimate sale at retail; or

(2) A service listed in subsection (4) of section 77-2701.16 which will become an ingredient or component part of a service listed in subsection (4) of section 77-2701.16 for ultimate sale at retail.

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 60;

Laws 2003, LB 759, § 19;

Laws 2008, LB916, § 19.